Washington statutes.
RCW 35.70.100

Provisions of chapter not exclusive.

This chapter shall not be construed as repealing or amending any provision relating to the improvement of streets or public places by special assessments commonly known as local improvement laws, but shall be considered as additional legislation and auxiliary thereto and the city or town council, of any city of the second class or town before exercising the authority herein granted may by ordinance provide for the application and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter within the limitations herein specified.

[ 1994 c 81 s 63; 1965 c 7 s 35.70.100. Prior: 1915 c 149 s 8; RRS s 9162.]